test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_I_NoExtra_nagizh_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ginagizhimishinian
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ginagizhimishiniag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ginagizhimishiniing
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: onagizhimishinaanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: onagizhimishinaanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: onagizhimishinaaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: onagizhimishiwaaan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: onagizhimishiwaaag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: onagizhimishiwaaing
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: onagizhimishinian
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: onagizhimishiniag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: onagizhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ninagizhimishibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ninagizhimishibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ninagizhimishibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhimish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ginagizhimishibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ginagizhimishibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ginagizhimishibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhimish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: onagizhimishibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: onagizhimishibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: onagizhimishibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: onagizhimish***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: onagizhimish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: onagizhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhiminaanibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhiminaanibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhiminaanibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhimiwaaibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhimiwaaibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhimiwaaibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninagizhiminiibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninagizhiminiibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninagizhiminiibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhiminaanibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhiminaanibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhiminaanibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhimiwaaibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhimiwaaibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhimiwaaibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginagizhiminiibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginagizhiminiibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginagizhiminiibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onagizhiminaanibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onagizhiminaanibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onagizhiminaanibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onagizhimiwaaibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onagizhimiwaaibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onagizhimiwaaibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onagizhiminiibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onagizhiminiibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onagizhiminiibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onagizhimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onagizhimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onagizhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhishinaanibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhishinaanibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhishinaanibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhishiwaaibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhishiwaaibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninagizhishiniibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninagizhishiniibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninagizhishiniibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhishinaanibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhishinaanibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhishinaanibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginagizhishiniibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginagizhishiniibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginagizhishiniibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onagizhishinaanibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onagizhishinaanibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onagizhishinaanibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onagizhishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onagizhishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onagizhishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onagizhishiniibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onagizhishiniibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onagizhishiniibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onagizhishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onagizhishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onagizhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nagizhensimishinaaniban
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nagizhensimishiwaaiban
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nagizhensimishiniiban
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nagizhensimishini***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nagizhenhimishinaaniban
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nagizhenhimishiwaaiban
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nagizhenhimishiniiban
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nagizhensimishinaanan
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nagizhensimishinaanag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nagizhensimishinaaning
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nagizhensimishiwaaan
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nagizhensimishiwaaag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nagizhensimishiwaaing
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nagizhensimishinian
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nagizhensimishiniag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nagizhensimishiniing
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nagizhenhimishinaanan
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nagizhenhimishinaanag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nagizhenhimishinaaning
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nagizhenhimishiwaaan
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nagizhenhimishiwaaag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nagizhenhimishiwaaing
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nagizhenhimishinian
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nagizhenhimishiniag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nagizhenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nagizhensimishibanan
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nagizhensimishibanag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nagizhensimishibaning
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nagizhensimish***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nagizhensimish***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nagizhensimish***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nagizhenhimishibanan
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhimishibanag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhimishibaning
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhimish***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nagizhensiminaanibanan
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nagizhensiminaanibanag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nagizhensiminaanibaning
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
